New York, session 2025-2026, S2639.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state administrative procedure act is amended by adding 2 a new section 403 to read as follows: 3 § 403. Compliance with the New York state climate leadership and 4 community protection act. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 5 contrary, the department of environmental conservation, the department 6 of public service, the New York power authority, the Long Island power 7 authority, the office of renewable energy siting, and the New York state 8 energy research and development authority shall, by promulgation of 9 regulations, require an application for a license to include information 10 regarding compliance with the goals set forth in the New York state 11 climate leadership and community protection act. Such information shall 12 require that each applicant provide information stating: 13 a. how the license aligns with the New York state climate leadership 14 and community protection act, including: 15 (i) how the license aligns with the greenhouse gas emission limits set 16 forth in section 75-0107 of the environmental conservation law; 17 (ii) what are the estimated greenhouse gas emissions resulting from 18 the license; 19 (iii) what energy source will be used; 20 (iv) what are the short-term and long-term energy sources that will be 21 used for the license and what are the anticipated short-term and long- 22 term effects of using such energy sources; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06853-01-5 S. 2639 2 1 b. how the license will impact the goals set forth in the New York 2 state climate leadership and community protection act, including calcu- 3 lations of energy usage, incorporating upstream impacts from point of 4 energy usage; 5 c. an assessment of impact on environmental justice pursuant to arti- 6 cle forty-eight of the environmental conservation law; and 7 d. the number of jobs estimated to be created as a result of the 8 license, if any. 9 2. This section shall apply to applications for the issuance, modifi- 10 cation or renewal of any permit, license, certificate, approval, regis- 11 tration, charter, or similar form of permission or authority required by 12 law, or by state agency rules having the force and effect of law, which 13 is required for a business undertaking, project or activity for an 14 applicant, but shall not include bonds or other forms of security 15 required to be submitted by applicants, any individual licenses for 16 practicing a profession prescribed in title eight of the education law, 17 filings under the uniform commercial code, or routine licenses and 18 permits for individual privileges, including licenses for operating a 19 motor vehicle. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.